test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-ristjmae86_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `rist́mä: # Verb (86) `rist́mä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     rist́mä+V+Inf/mA: rist́mä
     rist́mä+V+Inf: ristiq
     rist́mä+V+Act+PrfPrc: rist́nüq 
     rist́mä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [ristit, ristitü]

     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: risti
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [ristit, ristideq]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rist́
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ristimiq
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ristitiq
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rist́väq
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [riste, rist́se]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [ristet, risteq, ristedeq, rist́set, rist́sedeq, rist́seq]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [riste, rist́se]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ristemiq, rist́semiq]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ristetiq, rist́setiq]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [risteq, risteväq, rist́seq, rist́seväq]
     rist́mä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: risti

     rist́mä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ristidä
     rist́mä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ristitäs

     rist́mä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: rist́vä

     rist́mä+V+Jus: rist́kuq
